Hawaii statutes.
§193-23 Personnel laws; applicability.
The provisions of chapters 76, 78, and 88 and the appropriate collective
bargaining agreement, executive order, executive directive, or rule and except
provisions of state law relating to the application of the Social Security Act
of the United States to the extent that the Act shall be applicable under the
federal law establishing the youth programs, shall not apply to persons
employed under this part. [L 1963, c 74, §11; Supp, §98N-24; HRS §193-23; am L
1979, c 105, §17; am L 2002, c 148, §17]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next